Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-115 Drivers education fund
underwriters fee. (a) The commissioner shall assess and levy upon each
insurer, and self-insurer, a drivers education fund underwriters fee of $3 a
year on each motor vehicle insured by each insurer or self-insurer. This fee
is due and payable on an annual basis by means and at a time to be determined
by the commissioner.

(b) The commissioner shall deposit the fees
into a special drivers education fund account.

(c) The commissioner shall allocate the fees
deposited for each fiscal year in the following manner:

(1) $1 per registration to the commissioner to be
expended for the operation of the drivers education program provided in section
286-128(d); and

(2) $2 per registration to the director of commerce
and consumer affairs for:

(A) The drivers education program administered
by the department of education for high school students; and

(B) The traffic safety education program
established and administered by the department of education pursuant to section
302A-417.

(d) Motor vehicles insured under the joint
underwriting plan shall be excluded from the drivers education fund assessment.

(e) The commissioner shall adopt rules in
accordance with chapter 91 for the execution of this section and the
distribution of this fund. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 1989, c 208, §3; am L
1992, c 254, §3; am L 1993, c 280, §27; am L 1995, c 204, §2; am L 1996, c 89,
§15 and c 243, §1; am L 1997, c 368, §6; am L 2000, c 24, §7; am L 2002, c 242,
§1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next